Hawaii statutes.
[§124A-77] Number of votes required.
(a) No person may be convicted of an offense, except by the concurrence of
two-thirds of the members present at the time that the vote is taken.

(b) All sentences shall be determined by the
concurrence of two-thirds of the members present at the time that the vote is
taken.

(c) All other questions to be decided by the
members of a general or special court-martial shall be determined by a majority
vote. A tie vote on a challenge disqualifies the member challenged. A tie
vote on a motion for a finding of not guilty or on a motion relating to the
question of the accused's sanity is a determination against the accused. A tie
vote on any other question is a determination in favor of the accused. [L 1982,
c 171, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next